Kentucky statutes. TITLE XXI Agriculture and Animals
Penalties

247.990.
Penalties.

Any person who violates subsection (3) of KRS

247.270

or who diverts the funds or profits of a farm bureau to any purpose except the purposes of the farm bureau shall be guilty of theft and be punished as provided by law.

Any officer who makes a certificate required by subsection (2) of KRS

247.270

or by KRS

247.300

, knowing it to be false or incorrect in any particular, shall be fined not more than one hundred dollars ($100).

History.

42d-8, 42d-14, 42d-15: amend. Acts 1974, ch. 406, § 311; 1984, ch. 386, § 4, effective July 13, 1984; 2002, ch. 268, § 3, effective July 15, 2002; 2008, ch. 116, § 6, effective July 15, 2008.

247.991.
Penalties.

Any person who violates any speed limit established by the State Fair Board shall be fined not less than ten ($10) nor more than one hundred dollars ($100).

Any person who violates any other traffic control regulation established by the State Fair Board shall be fined not less than five ($5) nor more than twenty-five dollars ($25).

History.

Enact. Acts 1968, ch. 123, § 1 (3).

247.992.
Penalty.

Any person who violates subsection (3) of KRS

247.145

shall be fined not less than ten dollars ($10) nor more than one hundred dollars ($100), or imprisoned in jail for not less than one (1) day or more than ten (10) days or both.

History.

Enact. Acts 1968, ch. 124, § 1 (4).

247.993.
Penalty.

Any purchaser of the agricultural commodity covered in KRS

247.450

to

247.505

or KRS

247.4451

to

247.4483

who violates or fails or refuses to comply with any provision of KRS

247.450

to

247.505

or KRS

247.4451

to

247.4483

shall upon conviction be fined not less than twenty-five dollars ($25) nor more than fifty dollars ($50) for each offense; each day of violation, or failing or refusing to comply with the provisions of KRS 247.450 to 247.505 or KRS 247.4451 to 247.4483 shall constitute a separate offense.

History.

Enact. Acts 1968, ch. 171, § 17 (2); 1990, ch. 167, § 18, effective July 13, 1990.

247.994.
Penalties.

Any purchaser of soybeans, or corn, or small grains who violates, or fails or refuses to comply with the provisions of KRS

247.510

to

247.595

or KRS

247.5061

to

247.5095

, or KRS

247.6001

to

247.6035

, shall upon conviction be fined not less than twenty-five dollars ($25) nor more than fifty dollars ($50) for each offense. Each day of the violation, or failing or refusing to comply with the provisions of KRS

247.510

to

247.595

or KRS

247.5061

to

247.5095

, or KRS

247.6001

to

247.6035

shall constitute a separate offense.

Any operator of a livestock market, meat packing establishment, or slaughter establishment who violates or fails or refuses to comply with the provisions of KRS

247.610

to

247.685

shall upon conviction be fined not less than twenty-five dollars ($25) nor more than fifty dollars ($50) for each offense. Each day of the violation, or failing, or refusing to comply with the provisions of KRS

247.610

to

247.685

shall constitute a separate offense.

Any operator of a tobacco warehouse, tobacco manufacturing establishment, or tobacco dealer who violates or fails or refuses to comply with the provisions of KRS

247.710

to

247.785

shall upon conviction be fined not less than twenty-five dollars ($25) nor more than fifty dollars ($50) for each offense. Each failure to withhold or refusal to comply with the provisions of KRS

247.710

to

247.785

shall constitute a separate offense.

Any egg handler who violates, or fails, or refuses to comply with the provisions of KRS

247.850

to

247.865

shall, upon conviction, be fined not less than twenty-five dollars ($25) nor more than fifty dollars ($50) for each offense. Each day of violating, or failing, or refusing to comply with the provisions of KRS

247.850

to

247.865

shall constitute a separate offense.

History.

Enact. Acts 1974, ch. 83, § 19; 1976, ch. 9, § 17; 1976, ch. 265, § 17; 1980, ch. 120, § 18, effective July 15, 1980; 1986, ch. 180, § 11, effective July 15, 1986; 1990, ch. 223, § 19, effective July 13, 1990; 1990, ch. 397, § 19, effective July 13, 1990.

Legislative Research Commission Note.

(7/13/90) This section was amended
by two 1990 Acts which do not appear to be in conflict and have been compiled
together.